Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 6. Implementation of Plan

§ 4401.
Purpose and authority.

Any municipality that has adopted and has in effect a plan and has created a planning commission under this chapter may implement the plan by adopting, amending, and enforcing any or all of the regulatory and nonregulatory tools provided for in this chapter. All such regulatory and nonregulatory tools shall be in conformance with the plan, shall be adopted for the purposes set forth in section 4302 of this title, and shall be in accord with the policies set forth therein.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1969, No. 116

, § 5;

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 9, 10, eff. April 11, 1972;

1973, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 1974;

1975, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1983, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 15, 1995;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 91.

§ 4402.
Bylaws and regulatory implementation tools authorized.

A municipality may adopt regulatory tools, including the following specific regulatory tools which are more fully described in subchapter 7 of this chapter:

Zoning bylaws.

Site plan bylaws.

Subdivision bylaws.

Unified development bylaws.

Official map.

Impact fees.

Phasing.

Transfer of development rights.

Special or freestanding bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 92.

§ 4403.
Nonregulatory implementation tools.

A municipality may utilize the following tools, and other tools not specifically listed, in conformance with the municipal plan and for the purposes established in section 4302 of this title, alone or in conjunction with regulatory tools described in section 4402 of this title.

Capital budget and program. A municipality may adopt a capital budget and five-year program, pursuant to section 4430 of this title.

Tax increment financing. Pursuant to chapter 53 of this title, a municipality may create within its jurisdiction one or more tax increment financing districts.

Tax stabilization contracts. Pursuant to

32 V.S.A. §§ 4969

and 4985, a municipality may enter into tax stabilization contracts.

Purchase or acceptance of development rights. A municipality may purchase or accept development rights as a method to implement its plan, pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 155.

Plans supporting the municipal plan. A municipality may develop supporting plans and may incorporate these plans into the municipal plan pursuant to the process described in section 4385 of this title.

Advisory commissions. For the purposes of this chapter, the term “advisory commissions” includes advisory committees. A municipality may form commissions that are composed of persons with particular expertise or interest to assist with implementation of the plan in areas such as design review, historic preservation, housing, and conservation.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 93.

§ 4404.
State designation; implementation of municipal plan.

A municipality, to implement its municipal plan, may apply for State designation of an existing or planned municipal growth center, downtown, village center, new town center, or neighborhood development area as necessary for eligibility to receive associated benefits pursuant to chapter 76A of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 27, 2014.

§§ 4404a-4409.
Repealed. 2003, No. 115 (Adj. Sess.), § 119.